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DI3PI-01

DTC P 1300/14|Igniter Circuit Malfunction (No. 1)

DTC P 1305/15|Igniter Circuit Malfunction (No.2)

DTC P 1310/14|Igniter Circuit Malfunction (No.3)

DTC P 1315/14|Igniter Circuit Malfunction (No.4)

DTC P 1320/14

Igniter Circuit Malfunction (No.5)

DTC P 1325/14|Igniter Circuit Malfunction (No.6)

DTC P 1330/14|Igniter Circuit Malfunction (No.7)

DTC P 1340/14|Igniter Circuit Malfunction (No.8)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

A DIS (Direct Ignition System) has been adopted. The DIS improves the ignition timing accuracy, reduces
high-voltage loss, and enhances the the overall reliability of the ignition system by eliminating the distributor.
TheDISisa 1-cylinderignition systemwhichignites one cylinder with oneignition coil. Inthe 1-cylinder
ignition system, the one spark plug is connected to the end of the secondary winding. High voltage generated

in the secondary winding is applied directly to the spark plug. The spark of the spark plug pass from the center
elecrtode to the ground electrode.

The engine ECU determines ignition timing and outputs the ignition signals (IGT) for each cylinder. Based

on IGT signals, the power transistors in the igniter cuts off the current to the primary coil in the ignition coil

is supplied to the spark plug that are connected to the end of the secondary coil. At the same time, the igniter
also sends anignition confirmation signal (IGF) as afail -safe measuretothe engine ECU.
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DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

P1300/14
P1305/15
P1310/14
P1315/14
P1320/14
P1325/14
P1330/14
P1340/14

No IGF signal to engine ECU while engine is running

*OpenorshortinlGF 1 orlGF2andIGT 1 ~ 8circuitfrom

ignition coil with igniter

*No.1 ~ No.8ignition coil with igniter

*EngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

. IfDTCP 1300/14isdisplayed,checkNo. 1 ignition coil withigniter circuit.

. IfDTCP 1305/15isdisplayed, check No.2ignition coil withigniter circuit.

. IfDTCP 1310/14isdisplayed, check No.3 ignition coil withigniter circuit.

. IfDTCP 1315/14isdisplayed, check No.4 ignition coil withigniter circuit.

. IfDTCP 1320/14isdisplayed, check No.5ignition coil withigniter circuit.

. IfDTCP 1325/14isdisplayed, check No.6ignition coil withigniter circuit.

. IfDTCP 1330/14isdisplayed, check No.7 ignition coil with igniter circuit.

. IfDTCP 1340/14isdisplayed, check No.8ignition coil withigniter circuit.

. [fDTCP 1300/14,P 1315/14,P 1325/14,P 1330/14 are outputsimultaneously,IGF 1 circuitmaybe
open or short.

. IfDTCP 1305/15,P 1310/14,P 1320/14,P 1340/14 are output simultaneously, IGF2 circuitmay be
open or short.

. Readfreezeframedatausinghand -heldtester. Becausefreeze framerecordsthe engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air —fuelratioleanorrich, etc. atthetime
of the malfunction.

1 Check spark plug and spark (See page IG-1).

NG> Go to step 4.
OK \

2 | Check for open and short in harness and connector in IGF and IGT signal circuit
between engine ECU and ignition coil with igniter (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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3 [ Disconnect ignition coil with igniter connector and check voltage between termi-
nals IGF1, 2 of engine ECU connector and body ground.

ON
@ IGF2 (+) IGF1 (+)

BE6653
A05304

g

A05319

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment.
(b) Disconnect the ignition coil with igniter connector.
(c)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals IGF1, 2 of the engine ECU
connector and body ground.
OK:
Voltage: 4.5-55V

@

OK> Replace ignition coil with igniter.

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

4 | Check for open and short in harness and connector in IGT signal circuit between
engine ECU and ignition coil with igniter (See page IN-19).
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NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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ground.

5 [ Check voltage between terminals IGT1 ~ 8 of engine ECU connector and body

@ ON IGT41GT35r5 1671
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A03401

OK

PREPARATION:
Remove the glove compartment door.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals IGT1 ~ 8 of the engine
ECU connector and body ground when engine is cranked.
OK:

Voltage: More than 0.1 V and less than 4.5V

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE

During cranking or idling, check waveform between terminals
IGT1 ~ 8 and E1 of the engine ECU connector.

HINT:

Correct waveform appears as sohwn, with rectangle waves.

NG>

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

6 [ Disconnect ignition coil with igniter connector and check voltage between termi-
nals IGT1 ~ 8 of engine ECU connector and body ground.

ON '(f)T 4 '(S)T3|GT2 IGTL
| (+)
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PREPARATION:
(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the ignition coil with igniter connector.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals IGT1 ~ 8 of the engine
ECU connector and body ground when engine is cranked.
OK:

Voltage: More than 0.1 V and less than 4.5V

NG>

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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7 | Check ignition coil with igniter power source circuit.

ON
DL e

START

BE6653
A01761

yA01861

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the ignition coil with igniter connector.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal 1 of ignition coil with igniter
connector and body ground, when ignition switch is turned to
"ON” and "START" position.
OK:
Voltage: 9 - 14V

OK Repair ignition coil with igniter power source
circuit.

8 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between ignition switch and
ignition coil with igniter (See page IN-19).

3

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

9 [Check EFI main relay (Marking: EFI) (See page FI-52).

@

NG> Replace EFI main relay (marking: EFI).

Replace ignition coil with igniter.
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